Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-257
Deeds and other instruments; recording; duty of register of deeds to reference on instrument.

The register of deeds shall mark upon the deed or instrument, after recording the same, the book and page or computer system reference where the same is recorded.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 37, p. 287;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 24, p. 372;

R.S.1913, § 6227;

C.S.1922, § 5626;

C.S.1929, § 76-232;

R.S.1943, § 76-257;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 15.